Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2451.01
Management of long-term care facility;
prohibited acts.

Unless
otherwise allowed by state or federal law or regulation, the management of
a long-term care facility at which an automated medication system is located
shall not require a resident of the facility to obtain medication through
the automated medication system and shall not restrict or impair the ability
of a resident of the facility to obtain medications from the pharmacy of the
resident's choice.

Laws 2013, LB326, § 10.